Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2261
Department; duties.

The department shall ensure that:

(1) No individual involved in the designation of the state long-term care ombudsman has a pecuniary or other interest in a long-term care facility;

(2) No state long-term care ombudsman or ombudsman advocate has a pecuniary or other interest in a long-term care facility;

(3) Mechanisms are in place to identify and remedy all such or other similar conflicts; and

(4) The office has the ability to pursue administrative, legal, and other appropriate remedies on behalf of residents.

Laws 1992, LB 677, § 25;

Laws 2018, LB903, § 23.